Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5996.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 7yy. (1) Qualified principal residence property is exempt from the collection of taxes under this act to the extent provided for in subsection (2). (2) The exemption under this section is a partial exemption equal to 1 of the following: (a) For taxes collected under this act that are levied in the first calendar year following the transfer of ownership described in subsection (3)(a)(ii), a reduction in taxable value equal to 67% of the qualified surplus taxable value. (b) For taxes collected under this act that are levied in the second calendar year following the transfer of ownership described in subsection (3)(a)(ii), a reduction in taxable value equal to 33% of the qualified surplus taxable value. (3) As used in this section: (a) "Qualified principal residence property" means property that meets all of the following: (i) Is a principal residence exempt from the tax levied by a local school district for school operating purposes under section 7cc. (ii) In the immediately preceding calendar year or the calendar year before the immediately preceding calendar year, was subject to a transfer of ownership that resulted in an adjustment to taxable value under section 27a(3). (iii) One of the following, as applicable: (A) For taxes collected under this act that are levied in the first calendar year following the transfer of ownership described in subparagraph (ii), the taxable value of the property adjusted as described in subparagraph (ii) is more than 20% greater than what the taxable value of the property would have been if the property had not been subject to the transfer of ownership and taxable value adjustment described in subparagraph (ii). (B) For taxes collected under this act that are levied in the second calendar year following the transfer of ownership described in subparagraph (ii), the taxable value of the property adjusted as described in subparagraph (ii) is more than 20% greater than what the taxable value of the property would have been if the property had not been subject to the transfer of ownership and taxable value adjustment described in subparagraph (ii). (b) "Qualified surplus taxable value" means the dollar amount of the difference in taxable values described in subdivision (a)(iii)(A) or (B). Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 180 days after the date it is enacted into law. Enacting section 2. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 6005 (request no. H06141'26) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.